Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 4. Conduct of Election; Election Results.
§ 24.2-653.01.
Provisional ballots; electoral boards to make determination as to validity.

The electoral board shall meet on the day following the election and determine whether each person having submitted a provisional vote pursuant to §

24.2-653

was entitled to do so as a qualified voter in the precinct in which he offered the provisional vote. In the case of persons voting provisionally pursuant to §

24.2-653.3

, the electoral board shall determine of which district the person is a qualified voter. At the meeting, the voter may request an extension of the determination of the provisional vote in order to provide information to prove that the voter is entitled to vote in the precinct pursuant to §

24.2-401

. The electoral board shall have the authority to grant such extensions that it deems reasonable to determine the status of a provisional vote.If the board is unable to determine the validity of all the provisional ballots offered in the election, or has granted any voter who has offered a provisional ballot an extension, the meeting shall stand adjourned, not to exceed seven calendar days from the date of the election, until the board has determined the validity of all provisional ballots offered in the election.

The electoral board shall permit one authorized representative of each political party or independent candidate in a general or special election or one authorized representative of each candidate in a primary election to remain in the room in which the determination is being made as an observer so long as he does not participate in the proceedings and does not impede the orderly conduct of the determination. Each authorized representative shall be a qualified voter of any jurisdiction of the Commonwealth. Each representative, who is not himself a candidate or party chairman, shall present to the electoral board a written statement designating him to be a representative of the party or candidate and signed by the county or city chairman of his political party, the independent candidate, or the primary candidate, as appropriate. If the county or city chairman is unavailable to sign such a written designation, such a designation may be made by the state or district chairman of the political party. However, no written designation made by a state or district chairman shall take precedence over a written designation made by the county or city chairman. Such statement, bearing the chairman’s or candidate’s original signature, may be photocopied and such photocopy shall be as valid as if the copy had been signed.Notwithstanding the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.), attendance at meetings of the electoral board to determine the validity of provisional ballots shall be permitted only for the authorized representatives provided for in this subsection, for the persons whose provisional votes are being considered and their representative or legal counsel, and for appropriate staff and legal counsel for the electoral board.

If the electoral board determines that such person was not entitled to vote as a qualified voter in the precinct or district in which he offered the provisional vote, is unable to determine his right to vote, or has not been provided one of the forms of identification specified in subsection B of §

24.2-643

, or the signed statement that the voter is the named registered voter he claims to be, the envelope containing his ballot shall not be opened and his vote shall not be counted. The general registrar shall notify in writing pursuant to §

24.2-114

those persons found not properly registered or whose provisional vote was not counted.The provisional vote shall be counted if (i) such person is entitled to vote in the precinct pursuant to §

24.2-401

or (ii) the Department of Elections or the voter presents proof that indicates the voter submitted an application for registration to a state-designated voter registration agency or the voter’s information was transmitted by the Department of Motor Vehicles to the Department of Elections pursuant to §

24.2-411.3

prior to the close of registration pursuant to §

24.2-416

and the registrar determines that the person was qualified for registration based upon the application for registration submitted by the person pursuant to subsection B of §

24.2-652

.If the electoral board determines that such person was entitled to vote, the name of the voter shall be entered in a provisional votes pollbook and marked as having voted, the envelope shall be opened, and the ballot shall be placed in a ballot container without any inspection further than that provided for in §

24.2-646

.

On completion of its determination, the electoral board shall proceed to count such ballots and certify the results of its count. Its certified results shall be added to those found pursuant to §

24.2-671

. No adjustment shall be made to the statement of results for the precinct in which the person offered to vote. However, any voter who cast a provisional ballot and is determined by the electoral board to have been entitled to vote shall have his name included on the list of persons who voted that is submitted to the Department of Elections pursuant to §

24.2-406

.

The certification of the results of the count together with all ballots and envelopes, whether open or unopened, and other related material shall be delivered by the electoral board to the clerk of the circuit court and retained by him as provided for in §§

24.2-668

and

24.2-669

.

History.

2020, cc. 735, 908, 909, 920, 1064, 1065.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 908 and 909 amended portions of §

24.2-653

that were transferred to this section by Acts 2020, c. 735. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the amendments by Acts 2020, cc. 908 and 909 have been given effect in this section by substituting “a
state-designated voter registration agency or the voter’s information was transmitted by the Department of Motor Vehicles to the Department of Elections pursuant to §

24.2-411.3

” for ‘the Department of Motor Vehicles or other state-designated voter registration agency‘ in the second paragraph of subsection C.

Acts 2020, c. 920 amended portions of §

24.2-653

that were transferred to this section by Acts 2020, c. 735. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the amendments by Acts 2020, c. 920 have been given effect in this section by inserting the second sentence in subsection A and inserting “or district” in the first sentence in subsection C.

Acts 2020, cc. 1064 and 1065 amended a portions of §

24.2-653

that was transferred to this section by Acts 2020, c. 735. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the amendments by Acts 2020, cc. 1064 and 1065 have been given effect in this section by inserting “or the signed statement that the voter is the named registered voter he claims to be” in the first sentence of subsection C.

Acts 2020, cc. 1064 and 1065, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

§ 24.2-653.1.
Voters who did not receive absentee ballots; provisional ballots.

Any person who offers to vote pursuant to §

24.2-643

at his proper polling place or at a central absentee voter precinct established by the governing body of the county or city where he is registered to vote, but whose name is shown on the pollbook as having applied for an absentee ballot, shall be entitled to cast a provisional ballot if, for any reason, he did not receive or has lost the absentee ballot or has chosen to not vote absentee. In such case, he shall be required to present to the officer of election a statement signed by him that he did not receive the ballot, has lost the ballot, or has not cast the ballot, subject to felony penalties for making false statements as pursuant to §

24.2-1016

, before being given a printed ballot and permitted to vote the provisional ballot. The electoral board shall process the ballot in accordance with the provisions of §

24.2-653.01

and the instructions of the State Board.

History.

2006, c. 283; 2010, c. 348; 2014, cc. 540, 576; 2020, c. 735; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 471.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 348 inserted “or at a central absentee voter precinct established by the governing body of the county or city where he is registered to vote” in clause A (i).

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical and, in subsection B, substituted “printed” for “paper” in the first sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 735, rewrote the section, which had read, “A. The provisions of this section shall apply when (i) a person offers to vote pursuant to §

24.2-643

at his proper polling place or at a central absentee voter precinct established by the governing body of the county or city where he is registered to vote, (ii) his name is shown on the pollbook as having applied for an absentee ballot, and (iii) for any reason, he did not receive or has lost the absentee ballot. In such case, he shall be entitled to cast a provisional ballot after presenting to the officer of election a statement signed by him that he did not receive the ballot or has lost the ballot, subject to felony penalties for making false statements as pursuant to §

24.2-1016

. “B. Such person shall be given a printed ballot and be permitted to vote the provisional ballot in accordance with the provisions of §

24.2-653

and the instructions of the State Board. The electoral board shall process the ballot in accordance with the provisions of §

24.2-653

and the instructions of the State Board.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 471, effective July 1, 2021, added “or has chosen to not vote absentee” in the first sentence; inserted “or has not cast the ballot” in the second sentence; and made a stylistic change.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Election Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 121 (2006).

§ 24.2-653.2.
Ballots cast after normal close of polling hours due to court-ordered extension; provisional ballots.

Whenever the polling hours are extended by an order of a court of competent jurisdiction, any ballots marked after the normal polling hours by persons who were not already in line at the time the polls would have closed, notwithstanding the court order, shall be treated as provisional ballots under this section. The officers of election shall mark the green envelope for each such provisional ballot to indicate that it was cast after normal polling hours due to the court order, and when preparing the materials to deliver to the registrar or electoral board, shall separate these provisional ballots from any provisional ballots used for any other reason. The electoral board shall treat these provisional ballots as provided in §

24.2-653.01

; however, the counted and uncounted provisional ballots marked after the normal polling hours shall be kept separate from all other ballots and recorded in a separate provisional ballots pollbook. The Department of Elections shall provide instructions to the electoral boards for the handling and counting of such provisional ballots pursuant to this section.

History.

2020, c. 735.

§ 24.2-653.3.
Voters assigned to split precinct; provisional ballots.

Any voter who is assigned to a precinct that is split between two or more election districts and believes he was given a ballot for the district of which he is not a qualified voter may request, prior to casting the ballot, and shall be permitted to cast a provisional ballot for the district of which he believes he is a qualified voter and for the district in which the pollbook indicates he is registered. The provisional ballots shall be cast in accordance with the provisions of §

24.2-653

, except that the voter shall be given a printed ballot for the district of which he believes he is a qualified voter and for the district in which the pollbook indicates he is registered, and an envelope for each ballot, which shall be labeled with the corresponding district number. After marking each printed ballot, the voter shall seal each ballot in its corresponding envelope, and the ballot envelopes shall then be sealed in the green envelope provided for in §

24.2-653

.

At the meeting of the electoral board to determine the validity of all provisional ballots offered in the election, the electoral board shall verify in which district a voter who voted provisionally pursuant to this section is a qualified voter, and the provisional ballot cast by the voter for that district shall be counted. The electoral board shall process the ballot in accordance with the provisions of §

24.2-653.01

and the instructions of the State Board.

History.

2020, c. 920, §

24.2-653.2

.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2020 act having been §

24.2-653.2

.

§ 24.2-654.
Officers to lock and seal voting equipment and ascertain vote after polls closed; statement of results.

As soon as the polls are closed, the officers of election shall lock each voting and counting machine against further voting. They shall then proceed to ascertain the vote given at the election and continue without adjournment until they declare the results of the election. They shall seal the machines.

In ascertaining the vote, the officers of election shall complete a statement of results in duplicate on the form and in the manner prescribed by the State Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-258, 24-259, 24-312; 1966, c. 453; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-136, 24.1-222; 1974, c. 428; 1979, c. 329; 1981, c. 425; 1983, c. 461; 1985, c. 458; 1993, c. 641; 2014, cc. 540, 576.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical and, in the first paragraph, substituted “machine” for “device” twice.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, § 68; 9A M.J. Governor, § 2.

§ 24.2-655.
Representatives of political parties and candidates to be present on request.

Before proceeding to ascertain the vote, the officers of election shall determine whether no more than two representatives of each political party having candidates in the election and one representative of each independent candidate or primary candidate request to be present while the absentee ballots are cast, votes are counted, and returns are completed.

Each representative shall be a qualified voter of any jurisdiction in the Commonwealth and shall present to the officers of election a written statement certifying that he is an authorized representative, signed by his party chairman for the jurisdiction in which the election is held, the independent candidate, or the candidate in a primary, as appropriate. If the party chairman for the jurisdiction in which the election is held is unavailable to sign such a written designation, such a designation may be made by the state or district chairman of the political party. However, no written designation made by a state or district chairman shall take precedence over a written designation made by the party chairman for the jurisdiction in which the election is held. Such representatives shall be entitled to be present while the votes are counted and shall remain until the returns are completed.

In case such representatives, or any of them, do not request to be present, the officers shall notify the bystanders, if any, and select one or more to be present with any available representatives of the parties or candidates so that there are as many as four bystanders and representatives present.

The representatives and bystanders lawfully present shall have an unobstructed view of the officers of election and their actions while the absentee ballots are cast, votes are counted, and returns are completed. The representatives and bystanders lawfully present are prohibited from interfering with the officers of election in any way.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-260, 24-261; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-137; 1974, c. 428; 1993, c. 641; 2006, c. 177; 2010, c. 448; 2015, c. 133.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 177 added the last paragraph.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 448 substituted “any jurisdiction in the Commonwealth” for “the city or county in which the polling place is located” in the second paragraph.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 133 added the second and third sentences in the second paragraph.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Election Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 121 (2006).

§ 24.2-656.
Repealed by Acts 2003, c. 1015.

§ 24.2-657.
Determination of vote on voting systems.

In the presence of all persons who may be present lawfully at the time, giving full view of the voting systems or printed return sheets, the officers of election shall determine and announce the results as shown by the counters or printed return sheets, including the votes recorded for each office on the write-in ballots, and shall also announce the vote on every question. The vote as registered shall be entered on the statement of results. When completed, the statement shall be compared with the number on the counters on the equipment or on the printed return sheets. If, on any ballot scanner, the number of persons voting in the election, or the number of votes cast for any office or on any question, totals more than the number of names on the pollbooks of persons voting on the machines, then the figures recorded by the machines shall be accepted as correct. A statement to that effect shall be entered by the officers of election in the space provided on the statement of results.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-312; 1966, c. 453; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-222; 1974, c. 428; 1979, c. 329; 1981, c. 425; 1983, c. 461; 1985, c. 458; 1993, c. 641; 2014, cc. 540, 576; 2016, c. 464.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 464, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2020.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical, and substituted “systems” for “equipment and counters,” “machines” for “voting devices” and “devices,” deleted “all mechanical or” following “If, on” and inserted “recording.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 464, effective July 1, 2020, substituted “any ballot scanner” for “direct recording electronic machines” in the fourth sentence.

Law Review.

For article, “Election Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 575 (2001).

§ 24.2-658.
Machines with printed return sheets; disposition of sheets.

If machines that print returns are used, the printed inspection sheet and two copies of the printed return sheet containing the results of the election for each machine shall be inserted in the envelope containing the statement of results by the officers of election and sealed and returned as required by §

24.2-668

.

The printed inspection sheets and one copy of the printed return sheets shall be kept with the statement of results and preserved as provided in §

24.2-669

.

One copy of the printed return sheets shall be made available by the clerk of the circuit court on the day following the election and for 60 additional days for inspection and transcribing information therefrom by the public.

History.

1981, c. 425, § 24.1-222.1; 1985, c. 458; 1993, c. 641; 2014, cc. 540, 576.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical, and in the first and second paragraphs, substituted “statement of results” for “pollbooks”; in the first paragraph, substituted “machines” for “devices” and “machine” for “device”; and in the third paragraph, substituted “60” for “sixty.”

§ 24.2-659.
Locking voting systems after election and delivering keys to clerk; printed returns as evidence.

If the voting system is secured by the use of equipment keys, after the officers of election lock and seal each machine, the equipment keys shall be enclosed in an envelope that shall be sealed and have endorsed thereon a certificate of an officer of election stating the election precinct, the number of each machine, the number on the seal, and the number of the protective counter, if one, on the machine. The sealed envelope shall be delivered by one of the officers of the election to the clerk of the circuit court where the election was held. The custodians of the voting equipment shall enclose and seal in an envelope, properly endorsed, all other keys to all voting equipment in their jurisdictions and deliver the envelope to the clerk of the circuit court by noon on the day following the election.

If the voting systems are secured by the use of equipment keys or electronic activation devices that are not specific to a particular machine, after the officers of election lock and seal each machine, the equipment keys and electronic activation devices shall be enclosed in an envelope that shall be sealed and have endorsed thereon a certificate of an officer of election stating the election precinct. The sealed envelope shall be delivered by one of the officers of election to the clerk of the circuit court where the election was held.

If the voting system is secured by removal of the data storage device used in that election, the officers shall remove the data storage device and proceed to lock and seal each machine. The data storage device shall be enclosed in an envelope that shall be sealed and have endorsed thereon a certificate of an officer of election stating the election precinct, the number of each machine, the number on the seal, and the number of the protective counter, if one, on the machine. The sealed envelope shall be delivered by one of the officers of election to the clerk of the circuit court where the election was held. The equipment keys used at the polls shall be sealed in a different envelope and delivered to the clerk who shall release them to the general registrar upon request or at the expiration of the time specified by subsection F.

If the voting system provides for the creation of a separate master electronic back-up on a data storage device that combines the data for all of the voting systems in a given precinct, that data storage device shall be enclosed in an envelope that shall be sealed and have endorsed thereon a certificate of an officer of election stating the name of the precinct. The sealed envelope shall be delivered by one of the officers of election to the clerk of the circuit court where the election was held. The data storage device for the individual machines may remain sealed in its individual machine until the expiration of the time specified by subsection F. The equipment keys and the electronic activation devices used at the polls shall be sealed together in a separate envelope and delivered to the clerk who shall release them to the general registrar upon request or at the expiration of the time specified by subsection F.

If the voting system is secured by removal of the data storage device used in that election, and the only record of votes cast for any office or on any question is saved on that data storage device and not on the machine itself, the officers shall remove the data storage device and proceed to lock and seal each machine. Each such machine shall remain locked and sealed until it is returned to the site at which voting systems are stored in the locality. The data storage device shall be enclosed in an envelope that shall be sealed and have endorsed thereon a certificate of an officer of election stating the election precinct, the number of each machine, the number on the seal, and the number of the protective counter, if one, on the machine. The sealed envelope shall be delivered by one of the officers of election to the clerk of the circuit court where the election was held. The equipment keys used at the polls shall be sealed in a different envelope and delivered to the general registrar no later than noon on the day after the election.

The voting systems described in subsections A, B, C, and D shall remain locked and sealed until the deadline to request a recount under Chapter 8 (§

24.2-800

et seq.) has passed and, if any contest or recount is pending thereafter, until it has been concluded. Such machines and any envelope containing data storage devices shall be opened and all data examined only (i) on the order of a court of competent jurisdiction or (ii) on the request of an authorized representative of the State Board, or the electoral board or general registrar at the direction of the State Board, in order to ensure the accuracy of the returns. In the event that machines and data storage devices are examined under clause (ii), each political party and each independent candidate on the ballot, or each primary candidate, shall be entitled to have a representative present during such examination. The representatives and observers lawfully present shall be prohibited from interfering with the officers of election in any way. The State Board, local electoral board, or general registrar shall provide such parties and candidates reasonable advance notice of the examination.When the required time has expired, the clerk of the circuit court shall return all voting equipment keys and data storage devices to the general registrar.

The local electoral board or general registrar may direct the officers of election and custodians that any sealed equipment keys or data storage devices that are otherwise required by the provisions of this section to be delivered to the clerk of the circuit court shall instead be delivered to the principal office of the general registrar no later than noon on the day following the election. The general registrar shall secure and retain the sealed equipment keys and any other electronic locking or activation devices in his office and shall convey them to the clerk of the court by noon on the day following the ascertainment of the results of the election by the electoral board.

The provisions of this section requiring the locking and sealing of voting systems shall not apply to any ballot marking device and its data storage device provided pursuant to §

24.2-626.1

, where the number of persons voting in the election or the number of votes cast for any office or on any question are not recorded by the ballot marking device.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-314; 1962, c. 230; 1966, c. 453; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-224; 1974, c. 428; 1978, c. 778; 1985, c. 458; 1993, c. 641; 1995, c. 197; 2003, c. 1015; 2004, cc. 835, 993, 1010; 2006, c. 689; 2008, cc. 107, 385; 2014, cc. 540, 576; 2016, cc. 18, 218, 464, 489, 492.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 464, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2020.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, in subsection A, inserted “If the voting or counting device is secured by the use of equipment keys” at the beginning of the first paragraph, inserted the second paragraph, and substituted “15” for “fifteen” in the third paragraph.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 835, in subsection A, in the next-to-last sentence of the second paragraph, deleted “the” preceding “election to the clerk” and “or to the electoral board as specified in §

24.2-660

” at the end; and in subsection B, in the last sentence, inserted “and any other electronic locking or activation devices” and substituted “ascertainment of the results of the election by the electoral board” for “election.”

The 2004 amendments by cc. 993 and 1010 are identical, and added the fourth and fifth sentences in the first paragraph of subsection A, deleted “the” preceding “election to the clerk” and “or to the electoral board as specified in §

24.2-660

” following “election was held” in the second paragraph of subsection A, and added the third paragraph of subsection A.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 689 added the third through fifth sentences in the fourth paragraph of subsection A.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 107 and 385 are identical, and substituted “until the deadline to request a recount under Chapter 8 (§

24.2-800

et seq.) has passed” for “for the period of 15 days after the results of the election have been ascertained” in the first sentence of the fourth paragraph of subsection A.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical, and substituted “machine” for “device” and variations of “voting and counting device” throughout the section; deleted variations of “memory card, cartridge, or other” preceding “data storage” throughout the section; in subsection A substituted “that” for “which”; in the second and third paragraphs of subsection A substituted “device” for “medium” throughout; in the third paragraph of subsection A substituted “and counting machines” for “devices”; deleted “mechanical or” following “using” in the fifth paragraph of subsection A, and inserted “recording”; and deleted “of this section” following “subsection A” in subsection B.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 18 and 492 are identical, and substituted “general registrar” for “electoral board” in subsections C, D and in the third paragraph in subsection F; and twice inserted “or general registrar” in subsection F.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 218 and 489 are identical, and inserted subsection designations B through D and redesignated former subsection B as subsection G; added subsections E and H; in subsection F, inserted “described in subsections A, B, C, and D” in the first sentence, substituted “Such machines and any envelope containing data storage devices” for “The machines” in the second sentence, substituted “and data storage devices are examined under clause (ii)” for “are examined under clause (ii) of this paragraph” in the third sentence and inserted “and data storage devices” in the last paragraph; and in subsection G, rewrote the first sentence, which read “The local electoral board may direct that the officers of election and custodians, in lieu of conveying the sealed equipment keys to the clerk of the circuit court as provided in subsection A, shall convey them to the principal office of the general registrar on the night of the election”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 464, effective July 1, 2020, in subsection A, substituted “voting system” for “voting or counting machine” or a variant throughout, and deleted the next-to-last paragraph, which read: “When recounts occur in precincts using direct recording electronic machines with printed return sheets, the printed return sheets delivered to the clerk may be used as the official evidence of the results.”

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Election Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 121 (2006).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, § 75.

§ 24.2-660.
Repealed by Acts 2004, cc. 993 and 1010.

§ 24.2-661.
Detection and setting aside of double ballots.

After the votes on all voting and counting equipment have been determined and recorded, the officers of election shall proceed to examine and count the paper ballots to ascertain if any double ballots have been cast, and whether the number of ballots corresponds with the number of names on the pollbooks of persons who voted on paper ballots.
If two or more separate ballots are found so folded together as to represent the appearance of a single ballot they shall be laid aside until the count of the ballots is completed. If, upon a comparison of the count and the number of names of such qualified voters on the pollbooks, it appears that the two or more ballots thus folded together were cast by the same qualified voter, they shall be set aside and not counted.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-262, 24-313; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-138, 24.1-223; 1983, c. 461; 1985, c. 458; 1993, c. 641.

§ 24.2-662.
Procedure when paper ballots exceed names on pollbooks.

If the ballots in the container exceed the number of names on the pollbooks of persons who voted on paper ballots, all ballots shall be replaced in the ballot container. Then, after the container is well shaken, an officer of election, being blindfolded, shall withdraw a sufficient number of ballots to reduce the number of ballots left in the container to the number of such names on the pollbooks. The drawn ballots shall be set aside and not counted.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-263; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-139; 1983, c. 461; 1993, c. 641; 2003, c. 1015.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, substituted “container” for “box” throughout the section.

§ 24.2-663.
When ballot void.

If a printed ballot is found to have been voted for a greater number of names for any one office than the number of persons required to fill the office, or if the title of the office is erased, the ballot shall be considered void as to all the names designated to fill such office, but no further, and the ballot shall be counted for the other offices on the ballot. In the case of a ballot scanner machine, an election official is authorized to cause the ballot scanner to receive the ballot and count it in accordance with this section. No ballot shall be void for having been voted for fewer names than authorized.

If any person votes, either in person or absentee, more than one time in an election, all ballots received from such person shall be void and, if possible, not counted. If one such ballot has already been cast, any additional ballots received from such person shall be void and not counted.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-266; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-140; 1978, c. 778; 1993, c. 641; 2013, c. 469; 2014, cc. 540, 576.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c 469, in the first paragraph, inserted “paper,” “or a ballot that is inserted into an electronic counting device,” and “and the ballot shall be counted for the other offices on the ballot” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical and, in the first paragraph, substituted “printed” for “paper,” a variation of “a ballot scanner machine” for a variation of “an electronic counting device” twice, and deleted “or a ballot that is inserted into an electronic counting device” preceding “is found.”

§ 24.2-664.
Reduction in number of ballots.

Whenever the number of ballots is reduced by fraudulent or void ballots below the number of names of qualified voters on the pollbooks who voted on paper ballots, the cause of such reduction shall be stated in the space provided on the statement of results.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-624; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-141; 1981, c. 425; 1983, c. 461; 1993, c. 641.

§ 24.2-665.
How paper ballots counted.

When the number of paper ballots to be counted has been verified, the officers shall proceed to ascertain the number of votes cast by paper ballots for each person and for and against each question. The votes on all ballots for all offices and questions shall be counted. As soon as all ballots are counted, they shall be placed in an envelope or container labeled “counted ballots.” No person other than the officers of the election shall handle the ballots.

Only an official ballot prepared as provided for in this title shall be counted. If any unofficial ballot is found among the official ballots, the unofficial ballot shall be put aside, not counted and appropriately noted on the statement of results.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-246, 24-265; 1950, p. 165; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-142; 1981, c. 425; 1993, c. 641.

Cross references.

For constitutional provision forbidding canvassing or counting votes in secret, see Va. Const., Art. II, § 3.

§ 24.2-666.
Procedures to account for paper ballots.

The State Board shall prescribe appropriate forms and procedures for use by the local electoral boards, general registrars, and officers of election to account for all paper ballots, used and unused.

History.

1988, cc. 291, 318, § 24.1-143.1; 1993, c. 641.

§ 24.2-667.
Completion of statement of results.

At the conclusion of determining the votes cast on voting devices and paper ballots, the officers of election shall verify that all required data has been accurately entered, sign both copies of the statement of results, and affirm that the statement is complete and the information thereon is true and correct.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-246, 24-265, 24-312; 1950, p. 165; 1966, c. 453; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-142, 24.1-222; 1974, c. 428; 1979, c. 329; 1981, c. 425; 1983, c. 461; 1985, c. 458; 1993, c. 641.

§ 24.2-667.1.
Reporting of results; absentee votes.

The general registrar shall report to the Department for each precinct in his locality the number and results of absentee ballots cast by voters assigned to such precinct. Results from absentee voting and voting at the precinct on election day shall be reported separately. The general registrar shall also report to the Department of Elections the number and results of absentee ballots cast early in person pursuant to §

24.2-701.1

separately from the number and results of all other absentee ballots. The Department shall establish standards for ascertaining and reporting such information.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 471; 2022, cc. 125, 126.

Editor’s note.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 125 and 126 are identical, and added the first two and the last sentences; and inserted “also” in the second sentence.